fixer/src/main/resources/la/la/universal/la.aff
SFX P Y 1050
SFX P o       avi             o         
SFX P o       avique          o         
SFX P o       aviqve          o         
SFX P o       avine           o         
SFX P o       avive           o         
SFX P o       avisti          o         
SFX P o       avique          o         
SFX P o       aviqve          o         
SFX P o       avistine        o         
SFX P o       avistive        o         
SFX P o       avit            o         
SFX P o       avitque         o         
SFX P o       avitqve         o         
SFX P o       avitne          o         
SFX P o       avitve          o         
SFX P o       avitque         o         
SFX P o       avitqve         o         
SFX P o       avimus          o         
SFX P o       avimvs          o         
SFX P o       avimusque       o         
SFX P o       avimvsqve       o         
SFX P o       avimusne        o         
SFX P o       avimvsne        o         
SFX P o       avimusve        o         
SFX P o       avimvsve        o         
SFX P o       avistis         o         
SFX P o       avistisque      o         
SFX P o       avistisqve      o         
SFX P o       avistisne       o         
SFX P o       avistisve       o         
SFX P o       averunt         o         
SFX P o       avervnt         o         
SFX P o       averuntque      o         
SFX P o       avervntqve      o         
SFX P o       averuntne       o         
SFX P o       avervntne       o         
SFX P o       averuntve       o         
SFX P o       avervntve       o         
SFX P o       avere           o         
SFX P o       avereque        o         
SFX P o       avereqve        o         
SFX P o       averene         o         
SFX P o       avereve         o         
SFX P o       aui             o           
SFX P o       auique          o           
SFX P o       auine           o           
SFX P o       auiue           o           
SFX P o       auisti          o           
SFX P o       auistique       o           
SFX P o       auistine        o           
SFX P o       auistiue        o           
SFX P o       auit            o           
SFX P o       auitque         o           
SFX P o       auitne          o           
SFX P o       auitue          o           
SFX P o       auimus          o           
SFX P o       auimusque       o           
SFX P o       auimusne        o           
SFX P o       auimusue        o           
SFX P o       auistis         o           
SFX P o       auistisque      o           
SFX P o       auistisne       o           
SFX P o       auistisue       o           
SFX P o       auerunt         o           
SFX P o       aueruntque      o           
SFX P o       aueruntne       o           
SFX P o       aueruntue       o           
SFX P o       auere           o           
SFX P o       auereque        o           
SFX P o       auerene         o           
SFX P o       auereue         o           
SFX P o       ai              o         
SFX P o       aique           o         
SFX P o       aiqve           o         
SFX P o       aine            o         
SFX P o       aive            o         
SFX P o       aiue            o           
SFX P o       asti            o         
SFX P o       astique         o         
SFX P o       astiqve         o         
SFX P o       astine          o         
SFX P o       astive          o         
SFX P o       astiue          o           
SFX P o       ait             o         
SFX P o       aitque          o         
SFX P o       aitqve          o         
SFX P o       aitne           o         
SFX P o       aitve           o         
SFX P o       aitue           o           
SFX P o       aimus           o         
SFX P o       aimvs           o         
SFX P o       aimusque        o         
SFX P o       aimvsqve        o         
SFX P o       aimusne         o         
SFX P o       aimvsne         o         
SFX P o       aimusve         o         
SFX P o       aimusue         o           
SFX P o       aimvsve         o         
SFX P o       astis           o         
SFX P o       astisque        o         
SFX P o       astisqve        o         
SFX P o       astisne         o         
SFX P o       astisve         o         
SFX P o       astisue         o           
SFX P o       arunt           o         
SFX P o       arvnt           o         
SFX P o       aruntque        o         
SFX P o       arvntqve        o         
SFX P o       aruntne         o         
SFX P o       arvntne         o         
SFX P o       aruntve         o         
SFX P o       aruntue         o           
SFX P o       arvntve         o         
SFX P o       averam          o         
SFX P o       averamque       o         
SFX P o       averamqve       o         
SFX P o       averamne        o         
SFX P o       averamve        o         
SFX P o       averas          o         
SFX P o       averasque       o         
SFX P o       averasqve       o         
SFX P o       averasne        o         
SFX P o       averasve        o         
SFX P o       averat          o         
SFX P o       averatque       o         
SFX P o       averatqve       o         
SFX P o       averatne        o         
SFX P o       averatve        o         
SFX P o       averamus        o         
SFX P o       averamvs        o         
SFX P o       averamusque     o         
SFX P o       averamvsqve     o         
SFX P o       averamusne      o         
SFX P o       averamvsne      o         
SFX P o       averamusve      o         
SFX P o       averamvsve      o         
SFX P o       averatis        o         
SFX P o       averatisque     o         
SFX P o       averatisqve     o         
SFX P o       averatisne      o         
SFX P o       averatisve      o         
SFX P o       averant         o         
SFX P o       averantque      o         
SFX P o       averantqve      o         
SFX P o       averantne       o         
SFX P o       averantve       o         
SFX P o       aueram          o           
SFX P o       aueramque       o           
SFX P o       aueramne        o           
SFX P o       aueramue        o           
SFX P o       aueras          o           
SFX P o       auerasque       o           
SFX P o       auerasne        o           
SFX P o       auerasue        o           
SFX P o       auerat          o           
SFX P o       aueratque       o           
SFX P o       aueratne        o           
SFX P o       aueratue        o           
SFX P o       aueramus        o           
SFX P o       aueramusque     o           
SFX P o       aueramusne      o           
SFX P o       aueramusue      o           
SFX P o       aueratis        o           
SFX P o       aueratisque     o           
SFX P o       aueratisne      o           
SFX P o       aueratisue      o           
SFX P o       auerant         o           
SFX P o       auerantque      o           
SFX P o       auerantne       o           
SFX P o       auerantue       o           
SFX P o       aram            o         
SFX P o       aramque         o         
SFX P o       aramqve         o         
SFX P o       aramne          o         
SFX P o       aramve          o         
SFX P o       aramue          o           
SFX P o       aras            o         
SFX P o       arasque         o         
SFX P o       arasqve         o         
SFX P o       arasne          o         
SFX P o       arasve          o         
SFX P o       arasue          o           
SFX P o       arat            o         
SFX P o       aratque         o         
SFX P o       aratqve         o         
SFX P o       aratne          o         
SFX P o       aratve          o         
SFX P o       aratue          o           
SFX P o       aramus          o         
SFX P o       aramvs          o         
SFX P o       aramusque       o         
