fixer/src/main/resources/la/la/universal/la.dic
abiudico/APS
abrasi/P
abstersi/P
accersivi/P
accrevi/P
acquisivi/P
adbibi/P
adedi/P
adflexi/P
adglutino/APS
adito/AP
adlisi/P
admurmuro/APS
adordino/APS
adpetii/P
adpressi/P
adrisi/P
adsedi/P
adstiti/P
adtendi/P
adulo/APS
advesperavi/P
aestivo/APS
affluxi/P
agino/APS
allicui/P
ambadedi/P
amoeno/APS
annato/APS
anteii/P
aperui/P
apploro/AP
apsumsi/P
arpago/APS
arvolo/APS
assensi/P
asso/APS
astruxi/P
attrecto/APS
auro/APS
baiolo/APS
benifeci/P
bubulcito/AP
caeno/APS
calvi/P
cantito/AP
carpsi/P
celero/APS
chasmo/AP
circumabstuli/P
circumivi/P
circummeo/AP
circumscripsi/P
circumtonui/P
clanxi/P
coaequo/APS
coxi/P
cohaesi/P
collabefacto/AP
collubui/P
commaculo/APS
commiscui/P
communivi/P
comperivi/P
complui/P
conbibi/P
concerpsi/P
concorporo/APS
concucurri/P
condocefeci/P
conferbui/P
conforii/P
congenero/APS
conlaudo/APS
conlustro/APS
conminui/P
conmunivi/P
conpuli/P
conplevi/P
conpunxi/P
conrosi/P
conscii/P
considero/APS
conspui/P
consubsedi/P
contexi/P
contigi/P
contremui/P
convulsi/P
convolo/APS
corregno/APS
coxigo/AP
crucio/APS
curto/APS
deartuo/APS
decimo/APS
deculco/APS
dedolui/P
defeci/P
defragro/APS
defuso/APS
dehausi/P
delego/APS
deliniavi/P
demano/APS
demorsico/APS
deonero/APS
depinxi/P
deprecio/APS
dereliqui/P
descii/P
desului/P
destravi/P
desurrexi/P
detorrui/P
deversi/P
digno/APS
diripui/P
disglutino/APS
disputo/APS
distempero/APS
divolvi/P
ebullivi/P
ecfutii/P
effeci/P
eiulito/APS
elucido/APS
emonui/P
equito/APS
etussivi/P
evolo/APS
exarsi/P
excrevi/P
excurso/APS
exherbo/APS
exopto/APS
explendui/P
exscreo/APS
exstirpo/APS
exsustuli/P
exurrexi/P
fenestro/APS
flevi/P
frigefeci/P
gelo/APS
gusto/APS
humecto/APS
illevi/P
impedivi/P
impugno/APS
incerto/APS
incrusto/APS
indurui/P
infregi/P
inlargivi/P
innoto/AP
inploro/APS
inrumo/APS
insonui/P
intexi/P
interieci/P
interpurgo/APS
intervulsi/P
intumisco/P
irrepsi/P
labefeci/P
latro/APS
liqui/P
maculo/APS
maturavi/P
misi/P
mutuo/APS
nodo/AP
obcanui/P
obfenso/APS
oblittero/APS
observito/AP
obtempero/APS
occento/AP
offudi/P
opsono/APS
parsi/P
pellexi/P
percepi/P
perduxi/P
pergnovi/P
perminxi/P
perplui/P
persigno/APS
pertersi/P
pervigui/P
placo/APS
porrexi/P
praecenturio/APS
praedomui/P
praegno/APS
praemollivi/P
praeposui/P
praesipivi/P
praeterfluxi/P
praevulsi/P
procrevi/P
progenui/P
propuli/P
prospecto/APS
provolo/APS
quadro/APS
recandui/P
recordo/AP
redergui/P
refraeno/APS
religo/APS
renexi/P
replausi/P
resarsi/P
respui/P
retransivi/P
revigui/P
rugii/P
sarsi/P
scopo/AP
sequestro/APS
solido/APS
spui/P
subcinxi/P
subfundo/P
submisi/P
subrisi/P
subtendi/P
succurri/P
summovi/P
superfixi/P
superlacrimo/AP
supervexi/P
surripui/P
tetendi/P
titillo/APS
transabivi/P
transsilii/P
transspeci/P
tripartivi/P
ubero/APS
valefeci/P
venundedi/P
virui/P
abhorrvi/P
acvi/P
adhibvi/P
adplavsi/P
adtitvlo/APS
albescvi/P
appropinqvo/APS
attinvi/P
bvlimo/AP
circvmclamo/APS
circvmnexvi/P
circvmverti/P
collibvi/P
compiscvi/P
condocvi/P
conlvsi/P
conqvaesivi/P
consvefeci/P
convvlnero/APS
cvrsito/APS
deflvxi/P
delitvi/P
dereliqvi/P
detinvi/P
dirvpi/P
dissvevi/P
ecferbvi/P
effvtvi/P
emolvi/P
ervi/P
excalvi/P
exhvmoro/APS
exsicvi/P
extorrvi/P
ferrvmino/APS
fvlgvrivi/P
helvo/APS
impingvo/APS
incvdi/P
infvdi/P
innvi/P
insilvi/P
interfvdi/P
intribvi/P
ivdico/APS
lvxi/P
medvllo/APS
navsio/APS
obcvlco/APS
obolvi/P
obtvrsi/P
optinvi/P
percrebrvi/P
perivro/APS
personvi/P
plavsi/P
praecvssi/P
praeplexvi/P
praetitvlo/APS
prolvi/P
protrvsi/P
qvadrvplico/APS
recvro/APS
relvxi/P
resecvi/P
revomvi/P
seclvsi/P
strepvi/P
svbtvli/P
svblaqveo/AP
svbplevi/P
svbstitvi/P
svccidi/P
svggilo/APS
svpereffeci/P
svperinminvi/P
svperstrinxi/P
svpporto/APS
testicvlo/AP
transmvto/APS
tvmolo/APS
vsvrpo/APS
aceruo/APS
adseuero/APS
animaduorti/P
auoco/APS
circumuolo/APS
coniui/P
conuecto/APS
decreui/P
despreui/P
discupiui/P
ecferui/P
euaporo/APS
excreui/P
fulguriui/P
indaudiui/P
intergarriui/P
inuilui/P
moui/P
obuallo/APS
perlauo/APS
peruidi/P
praemoeniui/P
praeuexo/APS
quieui/P
resipiui/P
reuolui/P
subcreui/P
superiui/P
transuexi/P
uapulo/APS
uersifico/APS
uitupero/APS
